Hawaii statutes.
§142-4 Entry of animals without inspection
prohibited. No animal shall be allowed to enter the State except after
inspection by the department of agriculture and the issuance of a permit by the
department to the consignee or owner; provided that no fees for inspection
shall be charged, nor delays caused, concerning the landing of any domestic
animal for which a certificate of health has been issued as prescribed by the
Federal Cattle Contagious Disease Act. Every carrier, owner, or handler
bringing animals into the State shall be required to present these animals to
the department of agriculture for inspection. [L 1905, c 82, pt of §4; RL 1925,
§611; RL 1935, §206; RL 1945, §1055; RL 1955, §20-5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22;
am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-4; am L 1986, c 263, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next